District of Columbia statutes.
9-1205.02

Construction of switch connections — Plans to be approved by Mayor.

Before any of the work authorized in § 9-1205.01 shall be begun on the ground, a plan or plans thereof shall be prepared and submitted to the Mayor of the District of Columbia for his approval and only to the extent that such plans shall be so approved shall said work or any portion thereof be permitted or undertaken.

Aug. 6, 1935, 49 Stat. 537, ch. 449, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1426.
1973 Ed., § 7-1226.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).

Emergency Legislation

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government